Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. Teachers Who Teach the Use of Certain Aids or Devices for the Blind or Visually Impaired.

Sec. 47.80.400.
Qualifications for teaching the use of certain aids or devices for the blind or visually impaired.

A person who is employed to teach the use of orientation and mobility aids or assistive technology devices to students who are 16 years of age or older and who are blind or visually impaired may not receive payment from the state or a political subdivision of the state unless the person meets the training and experience requirements established by the department under this section.

The department shall, by regulation, establish minimum requirements for training and experience of persons who teach the use of orientation and mobility aids or assistive technology devices to students who are 16 years of age or older and who are blind or visually impaired. The department shall consider the standards adopted by national organizations that provide services to the blind and visually impaired when setting requirements under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 102 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For services to the blind or visually impaired, see 7 AAC 82.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 102, SLA 1998 provides that nothing in this section “modifies or terminates a contract in effect on September 14, 1998.”